Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PRAIRIE LAKES MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE AUTHORITY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $7,267,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Pollution Control Agency for a grant under the solid waste capital assistance grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.54, to Otter Tail County, acting on behalf of the Prairie Lakes Municipal Solid Waste Authority joint powers board comprised of Clay, Becker, Wadena, Otter Tail, and Todd Counties, to predesign, design, and construct an ash recovery and recycling waste processing plant to divert ash from landfills into road construction material and recover ferrous and nonferrous metals and to predesign, design, and construct a waste transfer station to receive municipal solid waste and demolition waste for transfer to regional facilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $7,267,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end